Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 3. General Partners.

Sec. 32.11.150.
Admission of additional general partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in writing in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide in writing for the admission of additional general partners, with the written consent of all partners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 817 et seq.

Sufficiency of procedure for designating or admitting additional general partner in limited partnership. 6 ALR4th 1277.

Sec. 32.11.160.
Events of withdrawal.

Except as approved by the specific written consent of all partners at the time, a person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

the general partner withdraws from the limited partnership under AS

32.11.250

;

the general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership under AS

32.11.330

;

the general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general partner

makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent;

files a petition or answer seeking for the general partner reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under a statute, law, or regulation;

files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the general partner in a proceeding of the nature of those specified in (A) — (D) of this paragraph; or

seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or a substantial part of the general partner’s properties;

unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, 120 days after the commencement of a proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under a statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within 90 days after the appointment without the general partner’s consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or a substantial part of the general partner’s properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed or within 90 days after the expiration of a stay, the appointment is not vacated;

in the case of a general partner who is a natural person,

the general partner’s death; or

the entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the general partner incompetent to manage the general partner’s person or the general partner’s estate;

in the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust, but not merely the substitution of a new trustee;

in the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

in the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter; or

in the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.170.
General powers and liabilities.

Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this chapter, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners. The rights of a creditor with respect to a general partner’s interest in a limited partnership are subject to AS

32.11.340

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 1, SLA 2000 provides that the amendment made to (b) of this section by sec. 2, ch. 1, SLA 2000 “does not apply to the remedies available to a judgment creditor for collecting a judgment entered by a court before March 8, 2000.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 841 et seq.

68 C.J.S., §§ 583, 584.

Liability of limited partner arising from taking part in control of business under Uniform Limited Partnership Act. 79 ALR4th 427.

Sec. 32.11.180.
Contributions by general partner; person both limited and general partner.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of the person’s participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.190.
Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote, on a per capita or any other basis, separately or with all or any class of the limited partners, on any matter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)